California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2026, and as of December 1 of that year is repealed, unless a later enacted statute, that is enacted before January 1, 2026, deletes or extends that date.

(b) (1) By
 September 1, 2006, and by September 1 of each subsequent calendar year that the Emergency Food for Families Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on a tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year as described in paragraph (3). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article shall be inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year, and shall be repealed on
 December 1 of that year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(c) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article prior to its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately prior to that repeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 723, Sec. 5.   (SB 61)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2026, pursuant to its own provisions.    Note: Termination provisions affect Article 14, commencing with Section 18851.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.5. Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18857. - 18857.3.]

18857.

(a) An individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the personal income tax liability, if any, be made to the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, which is established by Section 18857.1. That designation is to be used as a voluntary contribution on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year and once made is irrevocable. If payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s
 account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return to include a space labeled the “Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted. The form shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to fund the Crisis Intervention Team program that trains peace officers to assist, and engage safely with, persons living with mental illness.

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

 (f) Notwithstanding any other law, a
 voluntary contribution designation for the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall not be added on the return until another voluntary contribution designation is removed or space is available, whichever occurs first.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   (AB 1065)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18857.3.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18857.3, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18857.1.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18857. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18857 to be transferred to the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18857 for payment into that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   (AB 1065)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18857.3.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18857.3, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18857.2.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money transferred to the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board, the Controller, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board, the Controller, and the Department of the California Highway Patrol in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) (A) To the Department of the California Highway Patrol for disbursement to the National Alliance on Mental Illness California to fund the Crisis Intervention
 Team program that trains peace officers to assist, and engage safely with, persons living with mental illness.

(B) The National Alliance on Mental Illness California shall not use more than 5 percent of the moneys received pursuant to this article for administrative purposes.

(b) The Department of the California Highway Patrol shall report on its internet website information provided by the National Alliance on Mental Illness on the process for awarding money, the amount of money spent on administration, and an itemization of how program funds were awarded.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   (AB 1065)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Inoperative on date prescribed in Section 18857.3.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18857.3, on December 1 following inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------

18857.3.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1 of the seventh taxable year following the first appearance of the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund on the personal income tax return, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and each subsequent calendar year that the Mental Health Crisis Prevention Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year. The Franchise Tax
 Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article shall be inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year, and shall be repealed on December 1 of that year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 61, Sec. 1.   (AB 1065)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Repealed on December 1 of year prescribed in subd. (a) or subd. (b).    Note: Termination provisions affect Article 14.5, commencing with Section 18857.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 15. California Cancer Research Fund [18861. - 18864.]

18861.

(a) Any individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the California Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, pursuant to Section 18862. This designation is to be used as a voluntary contribution on the tax return.

(b) The
 contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation under subdivision (a) shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. In the event that payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the individual’s account, do not exceed the individual’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) If an individual designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be allocated among the designees on a pro rata basis.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the
 forms of the return to include a space labeled the “California Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted under subdivision (a). The forms shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to conduct research relating to the causes, detection, and prevention of cancer, to expand community-based education on cancer, and to provide prevention and awareness activities for communities that are disproportionately at risk or afflicted by cancer.

(f) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 427, Sec. 5.   (SB 440)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18864.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18864.)
-------------------------------------------

18862.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the California Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18861. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18861 to
 be transferred to the California Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18861 for payment into that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 427, Sec. 6.   (SB 440)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18864.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18864.)
-------------------------------------------

18863.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money transferred to the California Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by
 the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) To the Regents of the University of California for distribution of grants for the purposes of conducting research on the causes and treatments for cancer, expanding community-based education on cancer, and providing culturally sensitive and appropriate prevention and awareness activities targeted toward communities that are disproportionately at risk or afflicted by cancer, and for reimbursement of any costs incurred by the regents for administering the grants authorized pursuant to this section.

(b) The Legislature requests the Regents of the University of California to report on its Internet Web site the process for awarding money, the amount of money spent on administration, and an itemization of how program funds were awarded, including, but not limited to, information regarding
 recipients of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 427, Sec. 7.   (SB 440)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2032, as prescribed in Section 18864.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 18864.)
-------------------------------------------

18864.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2032, and is repealed on December 1, 2032.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and each subsequent calendar year that the California Cancer Research Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board
 shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year pursuant to paragraph (3). The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of the contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article is inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year and is repealed on December 1 of that calendar year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred
 fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(c) Notwithstanding the repeal of this article, any contribution amounts designated pursuant to this article prior to its repeal shall continue to be transferred and disbursed in accordance with this article as in effect immediately prior to that repeal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 130, Sec. 2.   (SB 1172)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2032, by its own provisions.   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 15, commencing with Section 18861.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 16. General Provisions [18871. - 18874.]

18871.

In implementing this chapter, all of the following requirements shall apply:

(a) Unless otherwise specifically required by law, each voluntary contribution fund or account established by this chapter shall be included on the forms of the return through the taxable year immediately preceding the year of repeal of the article establishing that voluntary contribution fund or account.

(b) Notwithstanding the repeal of any article of
 this chapter, the voluntary contribution fund or account specified in that article shall continue in effect until December 31 of the year of the repeal of that article, and any contribution designated pursuant to that article on a timely filed initial return for the taxable year immediately preceding the date of repeal shall be transferred and disbursed, and all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board and Controller in connection with the transfer and disbursement of these contribution amounts shall continue to be paid, in accordance with that article as it read immediately prior to its repeal.

(c) Unless otherwise specifically required by law, a contribution made to any voluntary contribution fund or account established by this chapter shall be subject to the following provisions:

(1) In the event that no designee is specified, the contribution shall, after reimbursement of the
 direct actual costs of the Franchise Tax Board for the collection and administration of contributions made under this article, be transferred to the General Fund.

(2) In the event an individual designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be allocated among the designees on a pro rata basis.

(d) (1) If the number of contingent voluntary contribution designations that are eligible to be added to the tax return for a taxable year is greater than the number of voluntary contribution designations removed, those contingent voluntary contribution designations that are eligible to be added to the tax return shall be added to the tax return in the order of the date of enactment, with the voluntary contribution designation
 with the earliest date of enactment to be added first.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision:

(A) A contingent voluntary contribution designation means a voluntary contribution designation authorized under this chapter that may not be added to the tax return until another voluntary contribution designation is removed from the tax form.

(B) The date of enactment of a contingent voluntary contribution designation authorized under this chapter shall be the date the act authorizing the contingent voluntary contribution designation was filed with the Secretary of State. In the event that more than one act authorizing a contingent voluntary contribution designation is filed with the Secretary of State on the same date, the act with the lowest chapter number will be conclusively presumed to have been filed with the Secretary
 of State before any other act authorizing a contingent voluntary contribution designation with a higher number.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (d), or the contingency language of an act prohibiting the addition of a contingent voluntary contribution designation until another voluntary contribution designation is removed, the Franchise Tax Board may add one or more voluntary contribution designations if the board determines that space is available on the tax return to accommodate the additional voluntary contribution designation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 170, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

18872.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is important to inform taxpayers that they may make voluntary contributions to certain funds or programs, as provided on the state income tax return. The Legislature further finds and declares that many taxpayers remain unaware of the voluntary contribution check-offs on the state income tax return. Therefore, it is the intent of the Legislature to encourage all persons who prepare state income tax returns to inform their clients in writing, prior to the completion of any tax return, that they may make a
 contribution to any voluntary contribution check-off on the state income tax return if they so choose.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 485, Sec. 151.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

18873.

Notwithstanding any other law, all of the following requirements shall apply to any new voluntary tax contributions, including an extension of any existing voluntary tax contribution:

(a) The words “voluntary tax contribution” shall be included as part of the name of the fund.

(b) (1) The administering agency’s Internet Web site shall
 report the process for awarding money, the amount of money spent on administration, and an itemization of how program funds were awarded by the agency, including, but not limited to, information regarding recipients of funds.

(2) An “administering agency” means the state agency or other governmental entity, other than the Franchise Tax Board and the Controller, to which funds are allocated to accomplish the purposes of the voluntary tax contribution designation.

(c) (1) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (2) or where another inoperative or repeal date is provided, the article establishing the voluntary tax contribution shall remain in effect only until January 1 of the seventh calendar year following the first appearance of the contribution on the personal income tax return, and is repealed as of December 1 of that year.

(2) The minimum contribution amount that must be received for the fund to continue appearing on the tax return is two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for the second calendar year after the first appearance of the fund on the personal income tax return and each calendar year thereafter. 

(d) Contributions made pursuant to the voluntary tax contribution shall be continuously appropriated from the fund to the administering agency to be spent as prescribed in the act in which the voluntary tax contribution is enacted.

(e) This section shall apply only to new voluntary tax contributions, including an extension of any existing voluntary tax contribution, that take effect on or after January 2, 2017.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 597, Sec. 1.   (SB 1476)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

18874.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b) and notwithstanding any other law, the following shall apply to any voluntary tax contribution fund established by this chapter, appearing on the tax return for the 2016 taxable year, that has a minimum contribution amount requirement for the 2017 calendar year in order to continue to appear on the tax return form for the 2017 taxable year:

(1) The minimum contribution amount requirement for the 2017 calendar year is equal to zero dollars ($0).

(2) The minimum contribution amount requirement for the 2018 calendar year, in order to appear on the tax return form for the 2018 taxable year, means the greater of either two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000), pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 18873, or the minimum contribution amount previously determined, pursuant to the provisions of the article establishing the fund, as of September 1, 2016, that would have been for the 2017 calendar year for that fund.

(b) This section does not apply to a voluntary contribution fund that is otherwise subject to repeal, pursuant to the provisions of the article establishing the fund, without regard to satisfying a minimum contribution amount
 requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 252, Sec. 19.   (AB 131)   Effective September 16, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 17. California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund  [18881. - 18885.]

18881.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Amyotrophic lateral sclerosis (ALS), more commonly known as Lou Gehrig’s disease, is a degenerative disease of the motor nerves that causes progressive weakness of all voluntary muscles. People with ALS become unable to move, swallow, speak, and breathe without assistance, usually remaining fully aware of what is happening to them and their families.

(b) ALS is a fatal disease. There is no cure and only a few drug therapies, none of which allow for meaningful life extension. Most ALS patients die within two to five years of symptom onset. Every 90 minutes someone is diagnosed with ALS, and every 90 minutes someone dies of the disease. ALS
 knows no racial, ethnic, or socioeconomic boundaries, often striking people at midlife and at the height of family, career, and financial responsibilities.

(c) The devastating physical, emotional, and financial effects caused by the progression of ALS and the 24-hour, seven-day-a-week caregiving required impact not only the patient, but the entire family. ALS is a family disease, and the need for a coordinated effort on the part of the research and clinical care community in California is essential.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this article, to establish a systematic program to bring together California’s academic, clinical, and scientific infrastructure to advance our collective understanding of the causes, cures, and prevention of ALS. The outcome of this collaboration may have direct effects and consequences on the development of a comprehensive system
 that may identify the causes, cures, and prevention of ALS, as well as improving the screening, diagnosis, and treatment of victims of ALS. This program shall underwrite the costs of bringing together California’s physicians, hospitals, laboratories, educational institutions, and other organizations and persons for the purpose of enabling organizations and persons to advance ideas and activities that will better our understanding of ALS clinical care and explore opportunities that science can play in the diagnosis, treatment, and prevention of ALS.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   (AB 511)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative as prescribed in subd. (b) of Section 18885 if its repeal conditions are met.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18885, on December 1, 2031, by subd. (a), or on earlier date prescribed in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

18882.

(a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2024, and before January 1, 2031, an individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the personal income tax liability, if any, be made to the California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund established in Section 18883. That designation is to be used as a voluntary contribution on the tax return.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation shall be made for any taxable year on the original return for that taxable year and once made is irrevocable. If payments and credits reported on the return, together with
 any other credits associated with the taxpayer’s account, do not exceed the taxpayer’s liability, the return shall be treated as though no designation has been made.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return to include a space labeled the “California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted. The form shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to support the collaboration of clinicians, scientists, and academic and industry research organizations relating to the cure, screening, and treatment of ALS. 

(e) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for any contribution made pursuant to subdivision
 (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   (AB 511)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative as prescribed in subd. (b) of Section 18885 if its repeal conditions are met.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18885, on December 1, 2031, by subd. (a), or on earlier date prescribed in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

18883.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18882. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18882 to be transferred to the California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18882 for payment into that fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   (AB 511)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative as prescribed in subd. (b) of Section 18885 if its repeal conditions are met.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18885, on December 1, 2031, by subd. (a), or on earlier date prescribed in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

18884.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all money transferred to the California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board, the Controller, and the State Department of Public Health for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board, the Controller, and the State Department of Public Health in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) (A) To the State Department of Public Health, for disbursement to the Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Association Golden West Chapter, a California based nonprofit organization exempt from taxation under
 Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, to support the work of their California ALS Research Network in an effort to develop and advance the understanding, techniques, and modalities effective in the prevention, treatment, and cure of ALS.

(B) The Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Association Golden West Chapter shall not use moneys received pursuant to this article for administrative purposes.

(b) On or before January 1, 2025, and annually thereafter, the Amyotrophic Lateral Sclerosis Association Golden West Chapter shall provide to the State Department of Public Health information on how moneys received pursuant to this article were spent, including an itemization of how program funds were awarded, such as to specific research grants, projects, and events, and the department shall report that information on its internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   (AB 511)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Inoperative as prescribed in subd. (b) of Section 18885 if its repeal conditions are met.   Repealed, pursuant to Section 18885, on December 1, 2031, by subd. (a), or on earlier date prescribed in subd. (b).)
-------------------------------------------

18885.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (b), this article shall remain in effect only until December 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(b) (1) By September 1 of the second calendar year and each subsequent calendar year that the California ALS Research Network Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund appears on the tax return, the Franchise Tax Board shall determine whether the amount of contributions estimated to be received during the calendar year will equal or exceed the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year. The Franchise Tax Board shall estimate the amount of contributions to be received by using the actual amounts received and an estimate of the contributions that will be received by the end of that calendar year,
 and shall provide written notification of those estimates to the State Department of Public Health.

(2) If the Franchise Tax Board determines that the amount of contributions estimated to be received during a calendar year will not at least equal the minimum contribution amount for the calendar year, this article shall be inoperative with respect to taxable years beginning on or after January 1 of that calendar year, and shall be repealed on December 1 of that year.

(3) For purposes of this section, the minimum contribution amount for a calendar year means two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   (AB 511)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed on or before December 1, 2031, as prescribed by its own provisions.   Note: Termination provisions affect Article 17, commencing with Section 18881.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 20. School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund [18895. - 18898.]

18895.

(a) An individual may designate on the tax return that a contribution in excess of the tax liability, if any, be made to the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund established by Section 18896.

(b) The contributions shall be in full dollar amounts and may be made individually by each signatory on a joint return.

(c) A designation under subdivision (a) shall be made for a taxable year on the original return for that taxable year, and once made shall be irrevocable. If payments and credits reported on the return, together with any other credits associated with the individual’s account, do not exceed the individual’s tax liability, the return shall be treated as though no
 designation has been made.

(d) If an individual designates a contribution to more than one account or fund listed on the tax return, and the amount available is insufficient to satisfy the total amount designated, the contribution shall be allocated among the designees on a pro rata basis.

(e) The Franchise Tax Board shall revise the form of the return to include a space labeled “School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund” to allow for the designation permitted under subdivision (a). The form shall also include in the instructions information that the contribution may be in the amount of one dollar ($1) or more and that the contribution shall be used to provide school supplies for homeless children.

(f) Notwithstanding any other law, a voluntary contribution designation for the School
 Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund shall not be added on the tax return until another voluntary contribution designation is removed.

(g) A deduction shall be allowed under Article 6 (commencing with Section 17201) of Chapter 3 of Part 10 for a contribution made pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 96, Sec. 2.   (AB 742)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2029, as provided in Section 18898.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 18898.)
-------------------------------------------

18896.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund to receive contributions made pursuant to Section 18895. The Franchise Tax Board shall notify the Controller of both the amount of money paid by taxpayers in excess of their tax liability and the amount of refund money that taxpayers have designated pursuant to Section 18895 to be transferred to the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. The Controller shall transfer from the Personal Income Tax Fund to the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund an amount not in excess of the sum of the amounts designated by individuals pursuant to Section 18895 for payment into that fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 96, Sec. 3.   (AB 742)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Inoperative on or before January 1, 2029, as provided in Section 18898.    Repealed on or before December 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 18898.)
-------------------------------------------

18897.

(a) All moneys transferred to the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, shall be continuously appropriated and allocated as follows:

(1) To the Franchise Tax Board, the State Department of Social Services, and the Controller for reimbursement of all costs incurred by the Franchise Tax Board, the Controller, and the State Department of Social Services in connection with their duties under this article.

(2) To the State Department of Social Services as follows:

(A) For the
 2014–15 fiscal year, the Controller shall transfer the funds appropriated to the State Department of Education for this purpose from Budget Items 6110-001-8075 and 6110-101-8075 to the State Department of Social Services. Funds transferred may be used for state operations or local assistance expenditures and for distribution to a nonprofit organization exempt from federal income tax as an organization described in Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code for the sole purpose of assisting pupils in California on a statewide basis pursuant to the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11301 et seq.) by providing school supplies and health-related products to partnering local education agencies for distribution to homeless children, as defined by the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 11434a). The nonprofit organization shall provide a
 minimum 100 percent match for all funds received from the School Supplies for Homeless Children Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund. If the nonprofit organization provides in-kind materials towards the 100 percent match, then the value of the in-kind materials contributing to a 100 percent match shall be verified by the donor donating the in-kind materials and cannot exceed the market value of the materials if sold at retail. The State Department of Social Services shall enter into a subvention services or grant agreement with the nonprofit organization.

(B) The State Department of Social Services’ first designation of a nonprofit organization shall be valid until January 1, 2017. On that date, and every three calendar years thereafter, while this section is operative and in effect, the State Department of Social Services shall designate the same or a
 different nonprofit organization pursuant to this section. The State Department of Social Services may revoke the designation if the nonprofit organization fails to comply with the provisions of this article. If a designation is revoked, the State Department of Social Services shall designate a new nonprofit organization within three calendar months or as soon as administratively feasible.

(C) Funds shall be distributed by the State Department of Social Services only after evidence is presented to the State Department of Social Services that demonstrates that the local education agencies, domestic violence shelters, or eligible basic living centers and transitional living centers, as specified in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2), have received the materials described in
 subparagraph (A).

(3) (A) Funds distributed to the nonprofit organization pursuant to this section shall be used only for costs incurred to procure, assemble, and ship school supplies and health-related products. Funds made available pursuant to this section shall not be used for administrative purposes, to reimburse costs associated with administering grants of school supplies and health-related products to local education agencies or domestic violence shelters, or for any purpose relating to the operation of the nonprofit organization.

(B) The nonprofit organization may provide school supplies and health-related products to children living in domestic violence shelters.

(C) The nonprofit organization may provide school supplies and health-related products to homeless children and homeless youth, as defined in Section 11139.3 of the Government Code, residing in or receiving services from eligible basic living centers and transitional living centers eligible for assistance as specified in the Runaway and Homeless Youth Act (42 U.S.C. 5701 et seq.), as that act read on January 1, 2015.

(b) The State Department of Social Services shall verify that the designated nonprofit organization procured school supplies and health-related products and provided matching funds or in-kind materials as described in this section.
